Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-506
Racial Profiling Advisory Committee; created; members; duties.

(1) The Racial Profiling Advisory Committee is created.

(2)(a) The committee shall consist of:

(i) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, who also shall be the chairperson of the committee;

(ii) The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or his or her designee;

(iii) The director of the Commission on Latino-Americans or his or her designee;

(iv) The executive director of the Commission on Indian Affairs or his or her designee; and

(v) The chairperson of the Commission on African American Affairs or his or her designee.

(b) The committee shall also consist of the following persons, each appointed by the Governor from a list of five names submitted to the Governor for each position:

(i) A representative of the Fraternal Order of Police;

(ii) A representative of the Nebraska County Sheriffs Association;

(iii) A representative of the Police Officers Association of Nebraska;

(iv) A representative of the American Civil Liberties Union of Nebraska;

(v) A representative of the AFL-CIO;

(vi) A representative of the Police Chiefs Association of Nebraska;

(vii) A representative of the Nebraska branches of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People; and

(viii) A representative of the Nebraska State Bar Association appointed by the Governor from a list of attorneys submitted by the executive council of the Nebraska State Bar Association.

(3) The committee shall meet and organize within thirty days after the appointment of the members. The committee shall meet semiannually at a time and place to be fixed by the committee. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson or at the request of two or more members of the committee.

(4) The committee shall advise the commission and its executive director in the conduct of their duties regarding (a) the completeness and acceptability of written racial profiling prevention policies submitted by individual law enforcement agencies as required by subsection (1) of section 20-504, (b) the collection of data by law enforcement agencies, any needed additional data, and any needed additional analysis, investigation, or inquiry as to the data provided pursuant to subsection (3) of section 20-504, (c) the review, analysis, inquiry, study, and recommendations required pursuant to subsection (7) of section 20-504, including an analysis of the review, analysis, inquiry, study, and recommendations, and (d) policy recommendations with respect to the prevention of racial profiling and the need, if any, for enforcement by the Department of Justice of the prohibitions found in section 20-502.

Laws 2004, LB 1162, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB746, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB99, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB741, § 1.
July 18, 2026